tests/у harmony.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Regular У harmony":
    ял<n><px2sg><nom> : ялу
    ывӑл<n><px2sg><nom> : ывӑлу
    тӗн<n><px2sg><nom> : тӗнӳ
    ҫерем<n><px2sg><nom> : ҫеремӳ

  "У harmony for words ending in vowels":
    кӗсье<n><px2sg><nom> : кӗсйӳ
    анне<n><px2sg><nom> : аннӳ
    училище<n><px2sg><dat> : училищӳне

  "У harmony for words ending in ь":
    супӑнь<n><px2sg><nom> : супанӳ
    тетрадь<n><px2sg><nom> : тетрадӳ
